Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 2. Electric Current

Cross references. —

As to authority relative to grant of franchises to public utilities generally, see §

15-1-103

.

As to power districts in connection with public utilities, see §§

37-2-216

to

37-7-212

.

As to applicability of §§

41-7-801

to

41-7-819

, relative to public irrigation and power districts, to cities and towns, see §

41-7-819

.

As to impounding and use of water for the generation of electric power under Colorado River Compact, see §

41-12-301

.

Stated

in

Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. City of Gillette, 584 P.2d 995,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of electric utility to nonpatron for interruption or failure of power, 54 ALR4th 667.

Debtor's protection under USC § 366 against utility service cutoff, 83 ALR Fed 207.

§ 15-7-201.
Supplying consumers outside corporate limits.

Any city or town which may acquire or construct an electric light or power plant may supply electric current to persons, corporations and municipal corporations outside the corporate limits and enter into the necessary contracts upon the terms and under any rules and regulations as agreed upon by the parties.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 426; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-426; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Authority.—

Construction.—

Authority.—

Supreme Court
of Wyoming declines the invitation to find an implicit power in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

15-7-201

(2015) when elsewhere the Wyoming statutes unambiguously grant the
power to the Public Service Commission (PSC). Applying its rules of
statutory construction to give effect to §

15-7-201

, as well
as to the statutes granting the PSC authority to regulate utilities,
the Supreme Court holds that a city's authority to enter into contracts
regarding its supply of electricity outside the city limits does not
override the PSC's authority to set the rates for that service. City of Torrington v. Smith, 2016 WY 126, 386 P.3d 336,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2016).

Legislature
granted a city the authority to provide electricity to customers outside
the city limits via Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

15-7-201

(2015), but reserved the authority to determine an appropriate rate
for the service provided outside the city limits to the Public Service
Commission (PSC) in Wyo. Stat Ann. §§

37-2-112

, 37-1-101(a)(vi)(C) and (a)(vi)(H)(II) (2015). The language of § 37-1-101(a)(vi)(H)(II) unambiguously grants the PSC exclusive regulatory power
over all municipally-owned public utility services provided to customers
outside the municipality's corporate limits. City of Torrington v. Smith, 2016 WY 126, 386 P.3d 336,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2016).

Construction.—

Plain language of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

15-7-201

(2015) grants a city the authority to provide services to customers and to enter into contracts regarding that service. But the statute is silent as to the city's authority to set rates. City of Torrington v. Smith, 2016 WY 126, 386 P.3d 336,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 15-7-202.
Joint board; agreement; purpose; powers; prohibition.

Two (2) or more cities or towns may enter into an agreement pursuant to W.S.

16-1-102

through

16-1-109

for a joint powers board to supply their need for electric power. The joint powers board may expand, finance or operate electrical systems owned by municipalities prior to March 1, 1975, and construct and operate any facilities located within or without the state for the generation or transmission of electrical energy to supply those electrical systems. No loans under W.S.

16-1-109

shall be granted for facilities to be constructed or operated outside the state.

The joint powers board may acquire a percentage undivided interest as a tenant in common with any other public or private entities in any such facility and may designate one (1) of the other participating entities as its agent, or may act as agent for any other participating entity in connection with the planning, acquisition, construction or operation of any such facility.

History.

Laws 1976, ch. 28, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-426.1; Laws 1978, ch. 31, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-203.
Existing contracts ratified.

Any contracts entered into by any city or town for supplying electric current outside its corporate limits are ratified and confirmed as valid and binding contracts, any other act or law to the contrary notwithstanding.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 427; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-427; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Quoted in

City of Torrington v. Smith, 2016 WY 126, 386 P.3d 336,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 15-7-204.
General powers.

Any city or town may:

Purchase electric current from outside its corporate limits upon terms and conditions agreed upon by the parties;

Construct an electric transmission line or electric power line upon and over all public roads and state highways if it does not interfere with the public in the use of the public roads and state highways;

Enact ordinances necessary to exercise the powers granted in this article and establish rules and regulations for the conduction, maintenance and operation of any electric transmission line constructed, purchased, extended or maintained and providing for the rates to be charged consumers of electric current either for lights, power or other purposes and for their collection.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 428 to 430; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-428 to 15.1-430; W.S. 1977, §§

15-7-204

to

15-7-206

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to power relative to facilities used for purpose of conveying electricity to incorporated city or town, see §

15-7-101

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Extent of authority.—

Authority set forth in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 15-7-204(a)(iii) (2015) to enact ordinances that provide for the rates does not explicitly grant power to the city to establish those rates. That power is granted to the city for customers within the city limits by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 37-1-101(a)(vi)(H)(II) (2015), which excludes municipalities from the Public Service Commission's (PSC's) jurisdiction; but that power is reserved to the PSC for customers outside the city limits. Any other reading of these two statutes would render Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 37-1-101(a)(vi)(H)(II) meaningless. City of Torrington v. Smith, 2016 WY 126, 386 P.3d 336,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2016).

Relation to other provisions. —

This section implements the express powers granted cities and towns to establish light plants and transmission lines to bring electricity from the place obtained granted by §

15-7-101

.Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Fixed rate formula in power contract held reasonable. —

Fixed rate formula agreed upon in a power contract between municipalities organizing an agency under the Wyoming Joint Powers Act (§§

16-6-101

through

16-6-121

) to produce and distribute electric power to their inhabitants was reasonable. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Ordinances providing for issuance of bonds

to be paid solely from receipts through operation of light and power plants were invalid because violating statute which prohibits issuance of bonds unless approved by people at bond election. Whipps v. Greybull, 56 Wyo. 355, 109 P.2d 805,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1941).

§ 15-7-205.
Line fund established; use.

All funds derived from the sale of electricity or electric current shall be placed in a separate fund to be known as “electric line fund,” and be used only for paying the expenses of operating, maintaining or extending the electric transmission line, including the transformers and other appurtenances necessary to its operation, until all of the bonds issued by the city or town for those purposes have been fully paid. However, any surplus in that fund, over and above the operating expenses and the expenses of extending and repairing the plants in any one (1) year, may be used to provide a sinking fund for the payment of bonds or to pay the interest or principal on the bonds.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 431; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-431; W.S. 1977, §

15-7-207

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-206.
Sale of power plant; election procedure; ballot; vote required.

If a written proposal to purchase a city or town owned works or plant for generating or distributing electrical energy for light, heat or power, is filed with the city or town clerk by any bona fide manufacturer or distributor of electricity in the state of Wyoming, the governing body, if in their judgment it appears to be in the best interests of the inhabitants of the city or town to sell the works or plant, may provide for submitting the question to the qualified electors of the city or town. The question shall be submitted to both property and nonproperty owners either at the next regular municipal election or at a special election called for that purpose. The election shall be called and conducted in the same manner as other city or town elections, except as otherwise provided in this section.

The official ballot shall contain the words “For Sale of Municipal Light Plant” and “Against Sale of Municipal Light Plant” and shall have a square to the right of each proposition. The elector shall express his vote by putting a cross in the square opposite the proposition he favors. If a majority of the legal votes cast upon the proposition in each ballot box are for the sale, the proposition is approved by the people, and the governing body shall take appropriate proceedings to consummate the sale. If the majority of ballots in either box is against the proposed sale, it shall not be concluded.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 432; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-432; W.S. 1977, §

15-7-208

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-207.
Election procedure; notice.

If the governing body of the city or town decides to submit the question of the sale of the property to a vote of the qualified electors, they shall publish, for a period of at least three (3) weeks before the election in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or town, a notice specifying the amount of the bid and the general terms and conditions contained in the proposal. A copy of the notice shall be posted for three (3) weeks immediately preceding the election in three (3) public places in the city or town.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 433; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-433; W.S. 1977, §

15-7-209

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-208.
Contents of proposal.

In submitting a written proposal for the purchase of any municipally owned electric light or power plant, the prospective purchaser shall specify the amount of his bid and the general terms and conditions of his offer.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 434; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-434; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-210; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-209.
Sale of power plant; disposition of monies received.

All monies received from the sale of property under this article shall be kept in a separate fund and be first used as necessary to pay current bills and unsecured obligations outstanding on account of the operation of the plant until it is turned over to the purchaser. The remainder of the proceeds of the sale shall be used for redemption of any bonds issued by the city or town for the purchase or erection and construction of the works or plant. The money shall not be expended or mixed with other funds of the city or town but shall be applied wholly towards the redemption of the bonds, together with the accumulated interest. If the property sold brings an amount in excess of the current bills, unsecured obligations and the outstanding bonds, the excess shall be placed in a sinking fund to retire any existing bonded indebtedness of the municipality. If there is no existing bonded indebtedness, the excess shall be placed in the municipal general fund and expended for general municipal purposes.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 435; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-435; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-211; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.